Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1933.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW to read as follows:The department shall create and install an interface between the Washington emergency medical services information system and the overdose detection mapping application program to provide universal access to all fatal and nonfatal overdose information to all law enforcement agencies and other emergency service providers in Washington. The department shall provide for the data to be aggregated by zip code in order to comply with the health insurance portability and accountability act of 1996 and other privacy considerations for individual overdose incidences.--- END ---